Missouri, session 2026, HB2282.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 1.550, to read as follows:
1.550. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Seventh
Amendment Preservation Act".
2. The general assembly finds and declares that the Seventh Amendment of the
Constitution of the United States is the core to the foundation of this nation and that the
ability to seek redress for wrongdoing is necessary in a civil society.
3. To preserve the constitutional rights of Missouri citizens and residents so that
they may receive their day in court, the following protections shall apply:
(1) The provisions of the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution
of Missouri occupy and preempt legislation involving civil litigation and laws, rules,
orders, or other actions that restrict a resident's day in court as it existed in 1822 and
expanded by the Thirteenth Amendment, Fourteenth Amendment, and Fifteenth
Amendment of the Constitution of the United States on a civil matter exceeding the
powers granted to state government, except to the extent that the laws, rules, orders, or
other actions are necessary and proper for governing courts and procedures therein;
(2) All federal and state acts, laws, executive orders, administrative orders, rules,
and regulations, whether past, present, or future, that infringe on a citizen's or
resident's right to his or her day in court as guaranteed by the Seventh Amendment to
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2282 2
the Constitution of the United States, and expanded by the Thirteenth Amendment,
Fourteenth Amendment, and Fifteenth Amendment of the Constitution of the United
States and by Article I, Section 22(a) of the Constitution of Missouri, shall be invalid in
this state;
(3) It shall be the duty of government to protect the rights of Missouri citizens
and residents so that citizens and residents may receive a trial by jury in all civil matters
in accordance with the Seventh Amendment of the Constitution of the United States and
Article I, Section 22(a) of the Constitution of Missouri;
(4) Any entity or person who knowingly acts under the color of any federal or
state law to deprive a Missouri citizen or resident of the rights or privileges ensured by
the federal and state constitutions to a civil trial shall be liable to the injured party for
the deprivation of their rights. Reasonable attorney's fees and costs may be awarded to
the prevailing party with specified exceptions;
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, there shall be no legislative
restrictions to settlement amounts, jury awards for damages of any kind, access to
courts, joinder, jurisdiction, or venue. Any such provision under Missouri law that
currently exists shall be null and void.
✔